Idaho statutes. Title 37 FOOD, DRUGS, AND OIL
Chapter 1 IDAHO FOOD, DRUG AND COSMETIC ACT
§ 37-126. Drugs or devices deemed adulterated.

A drug or device shall be deemed to be adulterated:

If it consists in whole or in part of any filthy, putrid, or decomposed substance; or (2) if it has been produced, prepared, packed, or held under insanitary conditions whereby it may have been contaminated with filth, or whereby it may have been rendered injurious to health; or (3) if it is a drug and its container is composed, in whole or in part, of any poisonous or deleterious substance which may render the contents injurious to health; or (4) if it is a drug and it bears or contains, for purposes of coloring only, a coal-tar color other than one from a batch certified under the authority of the federal act.
(a) (1) If it consists in whole or in part of any filthy, putrid, or decomposed substance; or (2) if it has been produced, prepared, packed, or held under insanitary conditions whereby it may have been contaminated with filth, or whereby it may have been rendered injurious to health; or (3) if it is a drug and its container is composed, in whole or in part, of any poisonous or deleterious substance which may render the contents injurious to health; or (4) if it is a drug and it bears or contains, for purposes of coloring only, a coal-tar color other than one from a batch certified under the authority of the federal act.

If it purports to be or is represented as a drug the name of which is recognized in an official compendium, and its strength differs from, or its quality or purity falls below, the standard set forth in such compendium. Such determination as to strength, quality or purity shall be made in accordance with the tests or methods of assay set forth in such compendium or in the absence of or inadequacy of such tests or methods of assay, these prescribed under authority of the federal act. No drug defined in an official compendium shall be deemed to be adulterated under this paragraph because it differs from the standard of strength, quality, or purity therefor set forth in such compendium, if its difference in strength, quality, or purity from such standard is plainly stated on its label. Whenever a drug is recognized in both the United States Pharmacopoeia and the Homeopathic Pharmacopoeia of the United States it shall be subject to the requirements of the United States Pharmacopoeia unless it is labeled and offered for sale as a homeopathic drug, in which case it shall be subject to the provisions of the Homeopathic Pharmacopoeia of the United States and not to those of the United States Pharmacopoeia. Nothing in this subsection shall be deemed to prohibit a change in the strength, quality or purity of a drug, if the change is made by or pursuant to the orders of a practitioner prescribing the drug for the purpose of administering the drug to a patient.

If it is not subject to the provisions of subsection (b) of this section and its strength differs from, or its purity or quality falls below, that which it purports or is represented to possess. Nothing in this subsection shall be deemed to prohibit a change in the strength, quality or purity of a drug, if the change is made by or pursuant to the orders of the practitioner prescribing the drug for the purpose of administering the drug to a patient.

If it is a drug and any substance has been: (1) mixed or packed therewith so as to reduce its quality or strength; or (2) substituted wholly or in part therefor. Nothing in this subsection shall be deemed to prohibit a change in the strength, quality or purity of a drug, if the change is made by or pursuant to the orders of the practitioner prescribing the drug for the purpose of administering the drug to a patient.

§ 37-127. Drugs or devices deemed misbranded. — A drug or device shall be deemed to be misbranded

If its labeling is false or misleading in any particular.

If in package form unless it bears a label containing (1) the name and place of business of the manufacturer, packer, or distributor; and (2) an accurate statement of the quantity of the contents in terms of weight, measure, or numerical count; Provided, that under clause (2) of this paragraph reasonable variations shall be permitted, and exemptions as to small packages shall be established, by regulations prescribed by the board.

If any word, statement, or other information required by or under authority of this act to appear on the label or labeling is not prominently placed thereon with such conspicuousness (as compared with other words, statements, designs or devices, in the labeling) and in such terms as to render it likely to be read and understood by the ordinary individual under customary conditions of purchase and use.

If it is for use by man and contains any quantity of the narcotic or hypnotic substance alpha-eucaine, barbituric acid, beta-eucaine, bromal, cannabis, carbromal, chloral, coca, cocaine, codeine, heroin, marihuana [marijuana], morphine, opium, paraldehyde, peyete [peyote], or sulphonmethane, or any chemical derivative of such substance, which derivative has been by the board after investigation, found to be, and by regulations under this act, designated as habit forming, unless its label bears the name and quantity or proportion of such substance or derivative and in juxtaposition therewith the statement “Warning — May be habit forming.”

If it is a drug and is not designated solely by a name recognized in an official compendium unless its label bears (1) the common or usual name of the drug, if such there be; and (2), in case it is fabricated from two (2) or more ingredients, the common or usual name of each active ingredient, including the kind and quantity or proportion of any alcohol, and also including, whether active or not, the name and quantity or proportion of any bromides, ether, chloroform, acetanilid, acotphenetidin, amidapyrine, anti-pyrine, atropine, hyoscine, hyoscyamine, arsenic, digitalis glucosines, mercury, ouabain, strophanthin, strychnine, thyroid, or any derivative or preparation of any substances, contained therein: Provided, that to the extent that compliance with the requirements of clause (2) of this paragraph is impracticable, exemptions shall be established by regulations promulgated by the board.

Unless its labeling bears (1) adequate directions for use; and (2) such adequate warnings against use in those pathological conditions or by children where its use may be dangerous to health, or against unsafe dosage or methods or duration of administration or application, in such manner and form, as are necessary for the protection of users: Provided, that where any requirement of clause (1) of this paragraph, as applied to any drug or device, is not necessary for the protection of the public health, the board shall promulgate regulations exempting such drug or device from such requirements.

If it purports to be a drug the name of which is recognized in an official compendium, unless it is packaged and labeled as prescribed therein: Provided, that the method of packing may be modified with the consent of the board. Whenever a drug is recognized in both the United States Pharmacopoeia and the Homeopathic Pharmacopoeia of the United States, it shall be subject to the requirements of the United States Pharmacopoeia with respect to packaging and labeling unless it is labeled and offered for sale as a homoeopathic [homeopathic] drug, in which case it shall be subject to the provisions of the Homoeopathic [Homeopathic] Pharmacopoeia of the United States, and not to those of the United States Pharmacopoeia.

If it has been found by the board to be a drug liable to deterioration, unless it is packaged in such form and manner, and its label bears a statement of such precautions, as the board shall by regulations require as necessary for the protection of public health. No such regulation shall be established for any drug recognized in an official compendium until the board shall have informed the appropriate body charged with the revision of such compendium of the need for such packaging or labeling requirements and such body shall have failed within a reasonable time to prescribe such requirements.

If it is a drug and its container is so made, formed, or filled as to be misleading; or (2) if it is an imitation of another drug; or (3) if it is offered for sale under the name of another drug.
(i) (1) If it is a drug and its container is so made, formed, or filled as to be misleading; or (2) if it is an imitation of another drug; or (3) if it is offered for sale under the name of another drug.

If it is dangerous to health when used in the dosage, or with the frequency or duration prescribed, recommended, or suggested in the labeling thereof.

If it is a drug sold at retail and quantity of aminopyrine, barbituric acid, cinchophen, dinitrophenol, sulfanilamide or their derivatives, or any other drug which has been found by the board to be dangerous to health when used in the dosage, or with the frequency or duration prescribed, recommended, or suggested in the labeling thereof, and so designated by the board in a regulation adopted; unless it is sold on a written prescription signed by a member of the medical, osteopathic, chiropodial, dental, or veterinary profession who is licensed by law to administer such drug, and its label bears the name and place of business of the seller, the serial number and date of such prescription, and the name of such member of the medical, osteopathic, chiropodial, dental, or veterinary profession.

A drug sold on a written prescription signed by a member of the medical, osteopathic, chiropodial, dental, or veterinary profession (except a drug sold in the course of the conduct of a business of selling drugs pursuant to diagnosis by mail) shall be exempt from the requirements of this section if — (1) such member of the medical, osteopathic, chiropodial, dental, or veterinary profession is licensed by law to administer such drug, and (2) such drug bears a label containing the name and place of business of the seller, the serial number and date of such prescription, and the name of such member of the medical, osteopathic, chiropodial, dental, or veterinary profession.

§ 37-128. Sale of new drugs — Regulations and procedures.

No person shall sell, deliver, offer for sale, hold for sale or give away any new drug unless (1) an application with respect thereto has become effective under section 505 of the federal act, or (2) when not subject to the federal act unless such drug has been tested and has not been found to be unsafe for use under the conditions prescribed, recommended, or suggested in the labeling thereof, and prior to selling or offering for sale such drug, there has been filed with the director an application setting forth (a) full reports of investigations which have been made to show whether or not such drug is safe for use; (b) a full list of the articles used as components of such drug; (c) a full statement of the composition of such drug; (d) a full description of the methods used in, and the facilities and controls used for, the manufacture, processing, and packing of such drug; (e) such samples of such drugs and of the articles used as components thereof as the board may require; and (f) specimens of the labeling proposed to be used for such drug.

An application provided for in subsection (a)(2) shall become effective on the sixtieth (60th) day after the filing thereof, except that if the director finds after due notice to the applicant and giving him an opportunity for a hearing, that the drug is not safe for use under the conditions prescribed, recommended, or suggested in the proposed labeling thereof, he shall, prior to the effective date of the application, issue an order refusing to permit the application to become effective.

This section shall not apply — (1) to a drug intended solely for investigational use by experts qualified by scientific training and experience to investigate the safety in drugs provided the drug is plainly labeled “For investigational use only”; or (2) to a drug sold in this state at any time prior to the enactment of this act or introduced into interstate commerce at any time prior to the enactment of the federal act; or (3) to any drug which is licensed under the Virus, Serum, and Toxin Act of July 1, 1902 (U.S.C. 1934 ed. title 42, Chap. 4).

An order refusing to permit an application under this section to become effective may be revoked by the director.

§ 37-129. Cosmetics deemed adulterated. — A cosmetic shall be deemed to be adulterated — (a) If it bears or contains any poisonous or deleterious substance which may render it injurious to users under the conditions of use prescribed in the labeling or advertisement thereof, or under such conditions of use as are customary or usual. Provided, that this provision shall not apply to coal-tar hair dye, the label of which bears the following legend conspicuously displayed thereon: “Caution

This product contains ingredients which may cause skin irritation on certain individuals and a preliminary test according to accompanying directions should first be made. This product must not be used for dyeing the eyelashes or eyebrows; to do so may cause blindness,” and the labeling of which bears adequate directions for such preliminary testing. For the purposes of this paragraph (e) the term “hair dye” shall not include eyelash dyes or eyebrow dyes.

(b) If it consists in whole or in part of any filthy, putrid, or decomposed substance.

(c) If it has been produced, prepared, packed, or held under insanitary conditions whereby it may have become contaminated with filth, or whereby it may have been rendered injurious to health.

(d) If its container is composed, in whole or in part, of any poisonous or deleterious substance which may render the contents injurious to health.

(e) If it is not a hair dye and it bears or contains a coal-tar color other than one from a batch which has been certified under authority of the federal act.

§ 37-130. Cosmetics deemed misbranded. — A cosmetic shall be deemed to be misbranded

If its labeling is false or misleading in any particular.

If in package form unless it bears a label containing (1) the name and place of business of the manufacturer, packer, or distributor; and (2) an accurate statement of the quantity of the contents in terms of weight, measure, or numerical count: Provided, that under clause (2) of this paragraph reasonable variations shall be permitted, and exemptions as to small packages shall be established by regulations prescribed by the board.

If any word, statement, or other information required by or under authority of this act to appear on the label or labeling is not prominently placed thereon with such conspicuousness (as compared with other words, statements, designs, or devices, in the labeling) and in such terms as to render it likely to be read and understood by the ordinary individual under customary conditions of purchase and use.

If its container is so made, formed, or filled as to be misleading.

§ 37-131. False advertising.

An advertisement of a food, drug, device, or cosmetic shall be deemed to be false if it is false or misleading in any particular.

For the purpose of this act the advertisement of a drug or device representing it to have any effect in albuminuria, appendicitis, arteriosclerosis, blood poison, bone disease, Bright’s disease, cancer, carbuncles, cholecytitis, diabetes, diptheria [diphtheria], dropsy, erysipelas, gallstones, heart and vascular diseases, high blood pressure, mastoiditis, measles, meningitis, mumps, nephritis, otitis media, paralysis, pneumonia, poliomyelitis (infantile paralysis), prostate gland disorders, pyelitis, scarlet fever, sexual impotence, sinus infection, smallpox, tuberculosis, tumors, typhoid, uremia, venereal disease, shall also be deemed to be false, except that no advertisement not in violation of subsection (a) shall be deemed to be false under this subsection if it is disseminated only to members of the medical, osteopathic, chiropodial, dental, or veterinary professions, or appears only in the scientific periodicals of these professions, or is disseminated only for the purpose of public-health education by persons not commercially interested, directly or indirectly, in the sale of such drugs or devices: Provided, that whenever the board determines that an advance in medical science has made any type of self-medication safe as to any of the diseases named above, the board shall by regulation authorize the advertisement of drugs having curative or therapeutic effect for such disease, subject to such conditions and restrictions as the board may deem necessary in the interests of public health: Provided, that this subsection shall not be construed as indicating that self-medication for diseases other than those named herein is safe or efficacious.

§ 37-132. Regulations by board — Hearings — Notice.

The authority to promulgate regulations for the efficient enforcement of this act is hereby vested in the board. The board is hereby authorized to make the regulations promulgated under this act conform, in so far as practicable with those promulgated under the federal act.

Hearings authorized or required by this act shall be conducted by the board or such officer, agent, or employee as the board may designate for the purpose.

Before promulgating any regulations contemplated by section 37-121; 37-123(j); 37-124; 37-127(d), (f), (g), (h), and (k), or 37-131(b)[, Idaho Code], the board shall give appropriate notice of the proposal and of the time and place for a hearing. The regulation so promulgated shall become effective on a date fixed by the board (which date shall not be prior to 30 days after its promulgation). Such regulation may be amended or repealed in the same manner as is provided for its adoption, except that in the case of a regulation amending or repealing any such regulation the board, to such an extent as it deems necessary in order to prevent undue hardship, may disregard the foregoing provisions regarding notice, hearing, or effective date.

§ 37-133. Inspection of establishments — Examination of specimens — Reports — Receipt for samples.

The director or his duly authorized agent shall have free access at all reasonable hours to any factory, warehouse, or establishment in which foods, drugs, devices, or cosmetics are manufactured, processed, packed, or held for introduction into commerce, or to enter any vehicle being used to transport or hold such foods, drugs, devices, or cosmetics in commerce, for the purpose: (1) of inspecting such factory, warehouse, establishment, or vehicle to determine if any of the provisions of this act are being violated, and (2) to secure samples or specimens of any food, drug, device, or cosmetic after paying or offering to pay for such sample. It shall be the duty of the director to make or cause to be made examinations of samples secured under the provisions of this section to determine whether or not any provision of this act is being violated.

Upon the completion of any inspection of a factory, warehouse, or other establishment and prior to leaving the premises, the director or his duly authorized agent making the inspection shall give to the owner, operator, or agent in charge, a report in writing setting forth any condition or practice observed by him which in his judgment indicates that any food, drug, device, or cosmetic in the establishment (1) consists in whole or in part of any filthy, putrid, or decomposed substances; or (2) has been prepared, packed, or held in unsanitary condition whereby it may have become contaminated with filth or whereby it may be rendered injurious to health.

If the director or his duly authorized agent making any such inspection of any warehouse, factory, or other establishment has obtained any samples in the process of the inspection, upon completion of the inspection and prior to his leaving the premises, he shall give to the owner, operator, or agent in charge, a receipt describing the samples obtained.

Whenever in the course of any such inspection of the factory, or other establishment where food is manufactured, processed, or packed, the director or his duly authorized agent making the inspection obtains a sample of any such food and if analysis is made of such sample for the purpose of determining whether such food consists in whole or part of any filthy, putrid or decomposed substance, or is otherwise unfit for food, a copy of the results of such analysis shall be sent promptly to the owner, operator, or agent in charge.

§ 37-134. Publication of reports by director — Dissemination of information.

The director may cause to be published from time to time reports summarizing all judgments, decrees, and court orders which have been rendered under this act, including the nature of the charge and the disposition thereof.

The director may also cause to be disseminated such information regarding food, drugs, devices, and cosmetics as the board deems necessary in the interest of public health and the protection of the consumer against fraud. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit the director from collecting, reporting, and illustrating the results of the investigations of the director.